Massachusetts, session 194th, H285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 18A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “committed ”, in line XX, the
following sentence:-
Physical health and mental health services shall meet or exceed current pediatric
community level standards of care as set by the American Academy of Pediatrics, which shall
include, but not limited to, preventative health care, health promotion, and continuity of care.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 18A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “counselor programs ”, in line
XX, the following sentence:-
It shall further be responsible for monitoring and enforcement of medical contracts to
improve medical care access and quality for children in the care and custody of the department.
of 1